Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Part 1

Political Party Organization

2-13-101. Chapter definitions.

In this chapter, “political party” and “party” mean “statewide political party” unless another intent is clearly shown.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1302.

2-13-102. Creation of state primary boards.

Each political party shall have a state executive committee which shall be the state primary board for the party.

The state primary board shall perform the duties and exercise the powers required by this title for its party.

The state primary board of each statewide political party created by this section is the immediate successor to the state board of primary election commissioners of each party. Wherever in the Tennessee Code the state board of primary election commissioners of a political party is referred to, “state primary board” shall be substituted.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, §§ 1, 8; T.C.A., § 2-1303.

Attorney General Opinions. T.C.A. §§2-13-102,2-13-103, and2-17-104, which require the establishment of a state primary board for each political party in Tennessee and give that board certain authorities, do not infringe on the political parties’ First Amendment right to freedom of association. OAG 19-11, 2019 Tenn. AG LEXIS 13 (7/30/2019).

2-13-103. State executive committee — Election — Composition — Terms.

Members of the state executive committee for each party are elected at the regular August primary election immediately before the election of the governor.

In each party's primary its voters in each senatorial district shall elect one (1) man and one (1) woman as members of the state executive committee for terms of four (4) years beginning on September 15 following their election.

Persons elected shall qualify by taking the oath of office and filing it with the coordinator of elections.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1304.

Attorney General Opinions. T.C.A. §§2-13-102,2-13-103, and2-17-104, which require the establishment of a state primary board for each political party in Tennessee and give that board certain authorities, do not infringe on the political parties’ First Amendment right to freedom of association. OAG 19-11, 2019 Tenn. AG LEXIS 13 (7/30/2019).

2-13-104. Party membership requirements for candidates.

All candidates for state executive committee membership and for membership in the general assembly shall be bona fide members of the political party whose election they seek. Except as provided in §2-13-115, a party may require by rule that candidates for its nominations be bona fide members of the party.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1973, ch. 106, § 3; T.C.A., § 2-1305; Acts 2018, ch. 992, § 1.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment, in the second sentence, substituted “Except as provided in §2-13-115, a” for “A”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 992, § 3. May 21, 2018.

2-13-105. Vacancies on state executive committee.

Each state executive committee may, by vote of its members, temporarily fill a vacancy in its membership due to death, resignation, disqualification, change of residence, persistent absence from meetings without good cause, or violation of the oath of office until a successor is chosen at the next regular August election.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1306.

2-13-106. State primary board — Operating provisions.

When acting as the state primary board of its party, the state executive committee shall operate subject to the following provisions:

The chair and secretary of the committee, duly elected under the rules of the political party, shall be the chair and secretary of the board;

Unless elected to the committee under § 2-13-103, the chair shall vote only in the event of a tie vote among the members and the secretary shall not vote; and

If there is not a quorum at a properly called meeting, the members present may adjourn from day to day and may treat the absence of a member after the first day of the meeting as a temporary vacancy unless there is known to be good cause for the absence. The members present may fill the vacancy for that meeting only.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1978 ch. 754, § 11; T.C.A., § 2-1307.

2-13-107. Recognition as a minor party.

To be recognized as a minor party for purposes of a primary election, a petition as required in § 2-1-104 must be filed no later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time, on the appropriate qualifying deadline as established in § 2-5-101(a) in the office of the coordinator of elections. Notwithstanding the minimum number of signatures required in § 2-1-104(a)(23), if an organization intends to establish a recognized minor party solely within one (1) county, in all other respects, the petition shall conform to the requirements established therein, except the petition must at a minimum bear the signatures of registered voters within such county equal to at least two and one-half percent (2.5%) of the total number of votes cast within such county for gubernatorial candidates in the most recent election for governor. The petition shall be accompanied by the name and address of the person or the names and addresses of the members of the group or association filing the petition to form the recognized minor political party.

To be recognized as a minor party for purposes of a general election, a petition as required in § 2-1-104 must be filed in the office of the coordinator of elections no later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time, ninety (90) days prior to the date on which the general election is to be held. Notwithstanding the minimum number of signatures required in § 2-1-104(a)(23), if an organization intends to establish a recognized minor party solely within one (1) county, in all other respects, the petition shall conform to the requirements established therein, except the petition must at a minimum bear the signatures of registered voters within such county equal to at least two and one-half percent (2.5%) of the total number of votes cast within such county for gubernatorial candidates in the most recent election for governor. The petition shall be accompanied by the name and address of the person or the names and addresses of the members of the group or association filing the petition to form the recognized minor political party.

Within thirty (30) days after receipt of such petition, the coordinator of elections shall determine the sufficiency of the petition, and if the petition is found sufficient, the minor party shall be recognized with all rights and obligations declared in this section.

Upon filing the required petition, candidates seeking to represent the minor party in a primary election must file nominating petitions as any other candidate for the desired office no later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time, on the appropriate qualifying deadline as established in § 2-5-101(a). If the coordinator of elections determines the petition meets the statutory requirements to be declared a recognized minor party, the candidates seeking to represent such minor party shall be placed on the appropriate primary ballot for such minor party. If the coordinator of elections determines the petition fails to meet the statutory requirements to be declared a recognized minor party, the candidates seeking to represent such minor party shall be placed on the appropriate general election ballot as independent candidates.

The name used by the minor party shall not be or include the name of any statewide political party then in existence or any word forming any part of the name of any statewide political party then in existence, and shall not include the word “independent” or “nonpartisan.” The coordinator of elections shall redact any portion of a minor party name that violates this section.

A recognized minor party must satisfy the requirements of § 2-1-114 no later than June 1 after the May primary elections are held pursuant to § 2-13-203(d) in order for its candidates to appear on the regular August general election ballot. If a recognized minor party fails to satisfy the requirements of § 2-1-114 by the required deadline, its candidates shall appear on the regular August general election ballot as independent candidates.

A recognized minor party must satisfy the requirements of § 2-1-114 no later than September 1 after the primary elections are held pursuant to § 2-13-202 in order for its candidates to appear on the regular November general election ballot. If a recognized minor party fails to satisfy the requirements of § 2-1-114 by the required deadline, its candidates shall appear on the regular November general election ballot as independent candidates.

If a petition filed pursuant to this section is determined to be sufficient by the coordinator of elections pursuant to subsection (b), such party shall be recognized as a minor party for all remaining primary and general elections in the current election year. However, if the recognized minor party is established solely within one (1) county, at least one (1) candidate for the recognized minor party must have received a number of votes equal to at least five percent (5%) of the total number of votes cast for candidates for the office of county mayor in the most recent election for such office. To maintain recognition beyond the current election year, a minor party must meet the requirements of a statewide political party as defined in § 2-1-104. A recognized minor party who fails to meet such requirements shall cease to be a recognized minor party. Such party may regain recognition only by following the procedures for formation of a recognized minor party. The coordinator of elections shall advise each county election commission of a recognized minor party's failure to receive a sufficient number of votes and shall order that said party cease to be recognized.

A recognized minor party shall be exempt from the requirements of §§ 2-13-103, 2-13-106 and 2-13-108.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1978, ch. 754, § 12; T.C.A., § 2-1308; Acts 2011, ch. 257, § 4; 2012, ch. 955, §§ 1-4; 2014, ch. 734, §§ 1-3.

Compiler's Notes. Pursuant to Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Tennessee, Acts 2014, ch. 734 took effect on April 21, 2014.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment added the second sentences in (a)(1), (2) and (f).

Effective Dates. Acts 2014, ch. 734, § 5. April 21, 2014. [See the Compiler's Notes.]

2-13-108. Meetings of state primary boards — Appointment of county primary boards.

Each state primary board shall meet at a public building in Nashville at least once in every even-numbered year at the call of its chair, or on such other occasions as may be necessary in order that it may fulfill its duties under this title.

Meetings of each state primary board shall be open and subject to title 8, chapter 44.

Each state primary board shall appoint five (5) persons in each county, for terms of two (2) years from the date of their appointment and until their successors are appointed and qualified by taking the oath, to compose its county primary boards.

The county primary board of each statewide political party created by this section for each county is the immediate successor to the county boards of primary election commissioners of each political party. Wherever in the Tennessee Code the county boards of primary election commissioners of political parties are referred to, “county primary board” shall be substituted.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, §§ 1, 9; 1974, ch. 465, § 1; 1976, ch. 739, §§ 1-3; 1977, ch. 480, § 7; T.C.A., § 2-1309.

2-13-109. Political party membership requirement for county primary boards.

Members of the county primary boards shall be bona fide members of the political party to whose county primary board they are appointed.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1310.

2-13-110. Lists of nominees for county primary boards.

Each state primary board shall appoint the members of its county primary boards from lists submitted by the county executive committees.

Where the list submitted by the county executive committee is not divided fairly among the elements of the party, the state primary board may appoint two (2) members of the county primary board without regard for the list, but it shall appoint the other three (3) members from the list submitted by the county executive committee.

If no list is submitted, the state primary board shall draw up its own list of nominees from which it shall appoint the county primary board for that county or it may designate the county election commission to act as its county primary board.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1976, ch. 600, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1311.

2-13-111. Organization of county primary boards.

The county primary boards shall organize within ten (10) days after their appointment by the election of a chair and secretary.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1978, ch. 754, § 13; T.C.A., § 2-1312.

2-13-112. Vacancies on county primary board.

Each county primary board shall immediately notify its state primary board upon the occurrence of any vacancy in its membership. The state primary board shall appoint new members to fill any vacancies in the membership of its county primary boards due to death, resignation or other cause. The person so appointed shall hold office during the unexpired term for which the person was appointed.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1313.

2-13-113. Information furnished primary boards.

The state and county election commissions shall furnish to the state and county primary boards such information and such access to records as may be required to enable the boards to carry out their duties under this title.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-1318.

2-13-114. Calendar of appearances.

The state executive committees for each statewide political party are urged to jointly establish a calendar of appearances in each county in this state enabling their respective gubernatorial candidates to appear together during the time between the primary and general elections.

At each such appearance, each candidate is to be given an opportunity to speak to those attending the event, and following each candidate's speech, a time is to be provided for a town-hall forum.

The schedule, if established, should be posted on the web site of each political party no less than fifteen (15) days prior to the primary election. Once established, any change to a scheduled appearance or if one of the candidates should be unable to appear, should be posted as soon as such information is available to the respective committee.

Acts 2009, ch. 236, § 1.

2-13-115. Exemption for honorably discharged veterans running for political office.

A person who is an honorably discharged veteran of the United States armed forces, a member of the Tennessee national guard, a member of the Tennessee air national guard, or an inactive reservist of any of the United States uniformed military services in good standing must not be disqualified as a candidate for any office if, for service-related reasons, that person was unable to comply with a statewide political party's or recognized minor party's rules for candidacy for nomination for such party, and such service-related reasons are the sole reason the person is unable to qualify.

Acts 2018, ch. 992, § 2.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 992, § 3. May 21, 2018.